Montana, session 2025, LC1611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 6] may be cited as the "Montana Electric
Vehicle Infrastructure Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 6], unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Department" means the department of environmental quality provided for in 2-15-3501.
(2) "Electric vehicle charging station" means a commercial charging station, including all required
equipment for the provision of power to and fueling of electric vehicles.
(3) "Local government" means a municipality, a county, or a consolidated city-county government
with 20,000 or more residents with adopted building codes pursuant to 50-60-201.
(4) "Objective standard" means a standard that:
(a) is uniformly verifiable and ascertainable by reference to an available external or uniform
benchmark or criterion by the applicant and local government permitting agency staff prior to the applicant's
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1611.1
filing of an electric vehicle charging station permit application; and
(b) does not require local government permitting agency staff to make a subjective determination
concerning an electric vehicle charging station permit application.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Legislative findings. (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) the transportation sector is a leading source of greenhouse gas emissions and pollution, and
vehicle electrification is a key component in reducing greenhouse gas emissions in the transportation sector;
(b) according to the United States department of energy, an electric vehicle produces an average
of less than one-fourth of the average emissions of a motor vehicle powered by an internal combustion engine
over its lifetime; and
(c) to comply with the state's duty to maintain and improve a clean and healthful environment in
Montana for present and future generations, as mandated in Article IX, section 9, of the Montana constitution,
the state needs to encourage the rapid deployment of a network for electric vehicle charging stations and other
infrastructure to support those electric vehicles.
(2) The legislature further finds that:
(a) it is in the best interest of Montanans and is a matter of mixed state and local concern to
facilitate the permitting of electric vehicle charging stations by streamlining the process for local governments to
approve permits for developing electric vehicle charging infrastructure; and
(b) more electric vehicle charging stations in the state will create jobs, increase spending at local
businesses, and bolster state and local commerce.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Electric vehicle charging station permit -- local government
permitting procedures and approval process -- reporting -- rulemaking. (1) (a) On or before January 1,
2027, the governing body of a local government shall adopt one of the following:
(i) an ordinance or resolution to incorporate the same standards and permitting process as, or
less restrictive standards and a less restrictive permitting process than, the standards and permitting process
described in the electric vehicle charging station permitting model code developed by the department pursuant
to [section 5];
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1611.1
(ii) an ordinance or resolution that establishes objective standards and an administrative review
process to be used by a local government permitting agency during the local government's review of
applications for electric vehicle charging station permits in accordance with [section 6(1)]; or
(iii) an ordinance or resolution that establishes that the local government does not intend to adopt
an ordinance or resolution in accordance with subsection (1)(a)(i) or (1)(a)(ii) and that the local government
permitting agency will continue to utilize the local government's existing permitting review process for electric
vehicle charging station permit applications.
(b) An ordinance or resolution adopted by a local government pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(ii)
must be developed in consultation with the local government fire department or district, any public utilities
serving the local government, and other relevant stakeholders as determined by the local government.
(2) A local government that is subject to the requirements of subsection (1)(b) shall:
(a) on or before March 1, 2027, submit a report to the department describing the local
government's compliance with subsection (1)(b); and
(b) on or before January 1, 2028, submit a report to the department regarding each application for
an electric vehicle charging station permit that was received by the local government permitting agency
between December 31, 2026, and December 1, 2027. The report must include for each electric vehicle
charging station permit application received:
(i) the final determination made by the local government permitting agency; and
(ii) the duration between the date the electric vehicle charging station permit application was
received and deemed complete and the date the local government permitting agency made a final
determination on the application.
(3) (a) A local government that has adopted the electric vehicle charging station permitting model
code published pursuant to subsection [section 5] or adopted an ordinance or resolution in accordance with
subsection (1)(a)(ii) may be eligible for an alternative energy and electric vehicle charging station loan pursuant
to 75-25-101.
(b) The department shall encourage electric vehicle charging station installation projects at parks
operated by local governments and at schools, locations that provide sport or recreational opportunities, and
other locations deemed appropriate by the local government.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1611.1
(4) The department shall adopt rules for:
(a) permitting model code procedures; and
(b) loan application processes and criteria.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Electric vehicle charging station permitting model code --
restrictions. (1) On or before March 1, 2026, the department shall publish an electric vehicle charging station
permitting model code that contains guidelines for the adoption of electric vehicle charging station permit
standards and permitting processes for local governments.
(2) The electric vehicle charging station permitting model code published pursuant to subsection
(1) must be developed by the department in consultation with local governments, public utilities, and other
relevant stakeholders as determined by the department.
(3) The electric vehicle charging station permitting model code may not contravene federal, state,
or local government building codes and electric regulations.
(4) The electric vehicle charging station permitting model code may not contain required timelines
that a local government permitting agency must comply with for the review, approval, or denial of electric
vehicle charging station permit applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Review process for electric vehicle charging station permit
application -- written notice. (1) (a) A local government permitting agency shall approve, conditionally
approve, or deny an application for an electric vehicle charging station permit using the local government's
administrative review process to determine whether the proposed electric vehicle charging station is in
compliance with the local government's objective standards.
(b) A local government permitting agency may not deny or place conditions on an application for
an electric vehicle charging station permit unless the denial or conditions are for the purpose of reasonably
protecting public health or safety.
(c) If a local government permitting agency denies an application for an electric vehicle charging
station permit, the local government permitting agency shall make written findings that the proposed electric
vehicle charging station would violate the local government's objective standards or would not be reasonably
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1611.1
protective of public health or safety and send those written findings to the applicant within 3 business days after
the date the application was denied.
(d) An applicant for an electric vehicle charging station permit that is denied a permit or has
conditions placed on the approval of a permit by a local government permitting agency may appeal the decision
to the governing body of the local government.
(e) The requirements of this subsection (1) do not apply to local governments that have adopted
the electric vehicle charging station permitting model code published pursuant to [section 5] or an ordinance or
resolution in accordance with [section 4(1)(a)(ii)].
(2) The department shall provide technical assistance to local governments to aid compliance with
the requirements of this section and provide training for local government permitting agency staff.
(3) Regardless of the type of ordinance or resolution adopted by a local government in accordance
with [section 4(1)], a local government permitting agency shall send notice to an applicant for an electric vehicle
charging station permit within 3 business days after the date the local government agency makes the
determination to approve, conditionally approve, or deny an application.

Section 7. Section 75-25-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-25-101. Alternative energy and electric vehicle charging station revolving loan account. (1)
There is a special revenue account called the alternative energy and electric vehicle charging station revolving
loan account to the credit of the department of environmental quality.
(2) The alternative energy and electric vehicle charging station revolving loan account consists of
money deposited into the account from air quality penalties from 75-2-401 and 75-2-413 and money from any
other source. Any interest earned by the account and any interest that is generated from a loan repayment
must be deposited into the account and used to sustain the program.
(3) Funds from the alternative energy and electric vehicle charging station revolving loan account
may be used to provide loans to individuals, small businesses, units of local government, units of the university
system, and nonprofit organizations for the purpose of installing electric vehicle charging stations pursuant to
[section 4] or building alternative energy systems, as defined in 15-32-102:
(a) to generate energy for their own use;
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1611.1
(b) for net metering as defined in 69-8-103; and
(c) for capital investments by those entities for energy conservation purposes, as defined in 15-32-
102, when done in conjunction with an alternative energy system.
(4) The amount of a loan may not exceed $40,000, and the loan must be repaid within 10 years."

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Appropriation. There is appropriated $100,000 from the general fund to
the department of environmental quality for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to be used to meet the
administrative requirements of [sections 1 through 6].

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 6] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 90, chapter 4, and the provisions of Title 90, chapter 4, apply to [sections 1
through 6].

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****